District of Columbia statutes.
7-2551.03

Exemptions.

(a)

No assault weapon originally distributed to a law enforcement agency or a law enforcement officer shall provide the basis for liability under this unit.

(b)

No action may be brought pursuant to this unit by a person injured by an assault weapon while committing a crime.

(c)

This section shall not operate to limit in scope any cause of action, other than that provided by this unit, available to a person injured by an assault weapon.

(d)

Any defense that is available in a strict liability action shall be available as a defense under this unit.

(e)

Recovery shall not be allowed under this unit for a self-inflicted injury that results from a reckless, wanton, or willful discharge of an assault weapon.

Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-263, § 5, 37 DCR 8482
1981 Ed., § 6-2393.
Pursuant to the Court’s holding in Bliley v. Kelly, 23 F.3d 507 (D.C.Cir.1994), the Congressional review period for the Assault Weapon Manufacturing Strict Liability Act of 1990, began to run on November 19, 1991, and the act took effect on February 29, 1992.
Application of Law 8-263: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-2551.01.